Washington statutes.
RCW 39.42.900

Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 184.

This act shall become effective coincident with the effective date of the constitutional amendment to Article VIII, section 1 and to Article VIII, section 3 of the Washington state Constitution as presented for a vote of the people by HJR 52, 1971 regular session. Unless such constitutional amendment shall be approved by the people at the next general election, this chapter shall be null and void.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 12.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: House Joint Resolution No. 52 was approved by the voters at the November 1972 general election.